Florida, session 2026, SB7004.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (q) of subsection (2) of section 12 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 14 public records.â 15 (2)âAGENCY INVESTIGATIONS.â 16 (q)1.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 17 a.ââConviction integrity unitâ means a unit within a state 18 attorneyâs office established for the purpose of reviewing 19 plausible claims of actual innocence. 20 b.ââConviction integrity unit reinvestigation informationâ 21 means information or materials generated during a new 22 investigation by a conviction integrity unit following the 23 unitâs formal written acceptance of an applicantâs case. The 24 term does not include: 25 (I)âInformation, materials, or records generated by a state 26 attorneyâs office during an investigation done for the purpose 27 of responding to motions made pursuant to Rule 3.800, Rule 28 3.850, or Rule 3.853, Florida Rules of Criminal Procedure, or 29 any other collateral proceeding. 30 (II)âPetitions by applicants to the conviction integrity 31 unit. 32 (III)âCriminal investigative information generated before 33 the commencement of a conviction integrity unit investigation 34 which is not otherwise exempt from this section. 35 2.âConviction integrity unit reinvestigation information is 36 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 37 Constitution for a reasonable period of time during an active, 38 ongoing, and good faith investigation of a claim of actual 39 innocence in a case that previously resulted in the conviction 40 of the accused person and until the claim is no longer capable 41 of further investigation. This paragraph is subject to the Open 42 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 43 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and 44 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 45 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.